Louisiana, session 2026, HB68.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:103(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:103(A)(9)
and (B)(3) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§103. Disturbing the peace
A. Disturbing the peace is the doing of any of the following in such manner
as would foreseeably disturb or alarm the public:
* * *
(9) Interrupting any worship service or religious ceremony at a church or
other place of worship by any of the following:
(a) Violent, tumultuous, or threatening behavior directed at any person
lawfully attending, leading, or participating in the service.
(b) Unreasonably loud or abusive language or noise such that the service is
materially disrupted.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 68 ENROLLED
(c) Interference with the conduct of the service by physical obstruction,
intimidation, or threat of force toward clergy, worship leaders, or attendees.
B.
* * *
(3)(a) Except as provided in Subparagraph (b), (c), or (d) of this Paragraph,
whoever commits the crime of disturbing the peace as provided in Paragraph (A)(9)
of this Section shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned for
not more than six months, or both. Thirty days of the sentence imposed shall be
served without benefit of probation or suspension of sentence.
(b) Whoever commits the crime of simple battery during the commission of
disturbing the peace as provided in Paragraph (A)(9) of this Section shall be
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than two years.
(c) Whoever commits the crime of simple criminal damage to property
during the commission of disturbing the peace as provided in Paragraph (A)(9) of
this Section shall be imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than two
years.
(d) Whoever commits the crime of disturbing the peace as provided in
Paragraph (A)(9) of this Section while armed with a dangerous weapon shall be
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than five years.
* * *
C. For purposes of Paragraphs (A)(7) and (8) of this Section:
(1) "Church or other place of worship" means any building, structure, or
defined outdoor area that is owned, leased, or otherwise lawfully possessed by a
religious organization that is used for organized religious worship or other religious
activities.
(2) "Funeral" includes a funeral, funeral home viewing, wake, or memorial
service.
(2) (3) "Funeral route" means the route of ingress or egress from the location
of a funeral or burial, including thirty feet from the outer edge of the outside lane of
the route.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 68 ENROLLED
(4) "Religious organization" means an entity that is operated for religious
purposes and qualifies for exemption from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. Section 501).
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.